Washington statutes.
RCW 13.36.090

Guardianship subsidies—Eligibility.

(1) Any guardian who is a foster parent licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 at the time a guardianship is established under this chapter and who has been the child's foster parent for a minimum of six consecutive months preceding entry of the guardianship order is eligible for a guardianship subsidy on behalf of the child. The department may establish rules setting eligibility, application, and program standards consistent with applicable federal guidelines for expenditure of state and federal funds.

(2) A child is eligible for guardianship subsidies when:

(a) The child has been placed for at least six consecutive months with a guardian who has been licensed for at least six consecutive months; or

(b) The child is placed with a guardian who is already receiving a guardianship assistance subsidy for the benefit of the child's sibling.

(3) A child need not be eligible for federal foster care reimbursement in order to qualify for state-funded guardianship assistance payments.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to guardianship assistance subsidies.

[ 2023 c 221 s 1; 2010 c 272 s 9.]